Georgia, session 2025_26, HB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to revenue and taxation, is
amended by revising paragraph (102) of Code Section 48-8-3, relating to exemptions from
sales and use tax, as follows:
"(102) Reserved; (A) Fifty percent of the sales price of a manufactured home if such
manufactured home is installed pursuant to Code Section 8-2-160 and will be converted
to real property pursuant to Code Section 8-2-183.1 within 30 days of the retail sale.
(B) As used in this paragraph, the term 'manufactured home' means a structure built on
a permanent chassis that:
(i) Is designed to be used as a dwelling;
H. B. 134
- 1 -

LC 50 0980
(ii) Is transportable in one or more sections;
(iii) Contains plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems; and
(iv) Is designed to have an angled roof and contain an area of at least 650 square feet.
(C) Within 30 days of a sale exempted as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, the seller shall complete the requirements of Code Section 8-2-183.1 and
properly file a copy of the Certificate of Permanent Location with the clerk of superior
court, or the commissioner shall recover from the seller 1.5 times the amount of tax
exempted by this paragraph.
(D) A manufactured home that is exempted as provided in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph shall not be eligible for a Certificate of Removal from Permanent Location
provided in Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Title 8, or any other manner of a return
to tangible personal property unless the amount exempted pursuant to subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph is paid to the commissioner.
(E) The exemption provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not apply
to any sales and use tax levied or imposed in an area consisting of less than the entire
state, however authorized, including, but not limited to, such taxes authorized by or
pursuant to:
(i) Constitutional amendment;
(ii) Section 25 of an Act approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as
amended, the 'Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965'; or
(iii) Article 2, 2A, 3, 4, 5, or 5A of this chapter;"
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"48-8-3.6.
(a) The General Assembly recognizes the importance of manufactured single-family
structures as a vital option in Georgia's housing inventory and the need to ensure that sales
H. B. 134
- 2 -

LC 50 0980
tax is charged only on the construction materials used to produce a manufactured
single-family structure and other tangible items used in the construction and installation of
such structures.
(b) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Manufactured single-family structure' means a manufactured home, as defined in
Code Section 8-2-131, used as a single-family residence.
(2) 'Manufacturer's invoice amount' means the sales price of the manufactured
single-family structure charged by the manufacturer of the structure in connection with
the wholesale sale of the structure to an entity for resale or use in a development, less any
specified intangible charges, including, but not limited to, transportation costs and
permits.
(c) The first retail sale or retail purchase in this state of a new manufactured single-family
structure shall be subject to the sales and use taxes which would otherwise be levied on
such retail purchase or retail sale, but only upon 60 percent of the manufacturer's invoice
amount. This subsection shall apply regardless of whether the Certificate of Permanent
Location has been filed.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, all retail sales and retail
purchases of manufactured single-family structures shall be exempt from all state and local
taxes imposed under this chapter.
(e) This Code section shall stand repealed on June 30, 2030."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 134
- 3 -